Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 12. Abandoned Mine Reclamation Program

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-1201.
Abandoned mine reclamation program.

In addition to any other powers and duties imposed by law, the governor, through the director shall perform any and all acts necessary or expedient to implement and administer an abandoned mine reclamation program pursuant to section 405 of P.L. 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1235] in accordance with an approved state reclamation plan and annual approved applications for implementation of specific reclamation projects.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section 405 of P.L. 95-87, referred to in this section, appears as 30 U.S.C. § 1235.

§ 35-11-1202.
State reclamation plan.

The state reclamation plan may provide for any or all of the following activities:

The acquisition, reclamation or restoration of land and water resources which were mined for coal or minerals or affected by coal or other mineral mining processes and left or abandoned in an unreclaimed or inadequately reclaimed condition prior to August 3, 1977, and for which there is no continuing reclamation responsibility under state or federal statutes. The effective date for the purpose of determining eligibility on federal lands managed by the forest service shall be August 28, 1974, and the effective date for determining eligibility on federal lands managed by the bureau of land management shall be November 26, 1980. Any of the activities under this paragraph shall reflect the following priorities in the order stated:

The protection of public health, safety, general welfare and property from extreme danger of adverse effects of mining and processing practices;

The protection of public health, safety and general welfare from adverse effects of mining and processing practices;

The restoration of land and water resources and the environment previously degraded by the adverse effects of coal and mineral mining and processing practices.

through (F) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 72, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 72, § 2.

The acquisition, reclamation and transfer of land to the state or to a political subdivision thereof, or to any person after a determination by the governor that such is an integral and necessary element of an economically feasible plan for a project to construct or rehabilitate housing for persons disabled as the result of employment in the mines or work incidental thereto, persons displaced by acquisition of land pursuant to this article, persons dislocated as a result of adverse effects of coal mining practices which constitute an emergency, or persons dislocated as the result of natural disasters or catastrophic failures from any cause. However, no part of the abandoned mine reclamation funds may be used to pay the actual construction costs of housing;

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 72, § 2.

Reclamation projects involving the protection, repair, replacement, construction or enhancement of utilities, such as those relating to water supply, roads and other facilities serving the public adversely affected by coal and mineral mining and processing practices. The construction and maintenance of public facilities in communities impacted by coal or mineral mining and processing practices is deemed to be included within the objectives established for the abandoned mine reclamation program, and shall be undertaken in accordance with the priorities stated in paragraph (i) of this subsection.

The state reclamation plan shall be developed by the governor, after recommendation from the director. The director after consulting the administrator of the abandoned land mine division shall make this recommendation only after he has prepared a proposed plan and afforded, at a minimum, an opportunity for the public to inspect and comment on this proposed plan in each county having land and water resources which qualify for acquisition, reclamation or restoration under subsection (a) of this section. All comments shall be recorded and considered in the development of the plan.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the governor may request abandoned mine land funds be appropriated for the construction of specific public facilities related to the coal or mineral industries or for other activities related to the impacts of these industries.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

§ 35-11-1203.
Abandoned mine reclamation account; subsidence mitigation account.

Upon approval of the state reclamation plan, the state treasurer shall create an abandoned mine reclamation account for the purpose of accounting for monies received by the state from the secretary of the interior and any other monies authorized to be deposited in the account. The account shall be administered in compliance with the approved plan.

Revenue to the account shall include amounts granted by the secretary of the interior under Title IV of P.L. 95-87, monies received by the state for the use or sale of lands acquired with monies from the account and such other monies which may be deposited in the account for use in carrying out the state reclamation program.

There is created a coal mine subsidence mitigation account. Revenue to the account shall be ten percent (10%) of the amount granted by the secretary of the interior under title IV of P.L. 95-87 as provided by P.L. 100-34. Revenue shall be deposited in an interest bearing account and all interest shall be credited to the program. No monies from the account shall be expended prior to September 30, 1995. After September 30, 1995 the money may be expended as provided in this subsection. The legislature shall authorize expenditure by appropriation from the account as necessary to defray the administrative expenses of the program. The remaining funds in the account shall only be used to address the reclamation activities described in W.S. 35-11-1202(a)(i)(A) and (B) where mine reclamation is necessary for the protection of the public health or safety, with a priority given to pay for contractual services to mitigate and control mine subsidence that threatens structures. If authorized by the United States congress, funds from the account may be used for the repair or enhancement of structures defined in W.S. 35-11-1301(a)(iii), provided that no funds from the account may be used for any structure where construction is commenced after the effective date of this act unless an engineering assessment documenting the minimal risk of loss from mine subsidence precedes commencement of construction. The liability of the state to fulfill the requirements of this subsection is limited to the amount of funds available in the account established in this subsection. The state has no obligations under this subsection except to the extent of federal funds deposited in the coal mine mitigation account and the interest thereon to operate the program.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1987, ch. 59, § 2; 1989, ch. 38, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1; ch. 186, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” in (a); and deleted “within the federal revenue fund” in (c).

Editor's notes. —

Title IV of P.L. 95-87, referred to in subsection (b), and in the second sentence in subsection (c), appears as 30 U.S.C. § 1231 et seq.

P.L. 100-34, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (c), appears as 30 U.S.C. §§ 1232 and 1278.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-11-1204.
Right of entry.

The director, administrator of the abandoned mine land division, or their designated authorized representative shall have the right to enter upon or have access to any property adversely affected by past coal mining practices to restore, reclaim, abate, control or prevent the adverse effects if the director makes a finding that:

The adverse effects on land or water resources are such that, in the public interest, the action should be taken; and

The owners of the property either are not known or readily available or refuse to give permission to enter.

Prior to entry, notice shall be given by mail to the owners, if known, or if not known, by posting notice upon the premises and advertising once in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the land.

Monies expended for work on or to the premises and the benefits accruing to any premises entered upon shall be chargeable against the land and shall mitigate or offset any claim of or any action brought by any owner of any interest in the premises for any alleged damages by virtue of the entry. However, this provision is not intended to create new rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.

The director, administrator of the abandoned mine land division, or their designated authorized representatives shall have the right to enter upon any property for the purpose of conducting exploratory work to determine the feasibility to restore, reclaim, abate, control or prevent the adverse effects.

Any entry under this section shall be construed as an exercise of the state’s police power and shall not be construed as an act of condemnation or trespass.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

§ 35-11-1205.
Land acquisition and disposal.

The state may acquire any land, by purchase, donation or condemnation, which is adversely affected by past coal mining practices if the director, with the concurrence of the governor, finds that acquisition of the land is necessary to successful reclamation and that:

The acquired land, after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices, will serve recreation and historic purposes, conservation and reclamation purposes or provide open space benefits; and

Permanent facilities such as a treatment plant or a relocated stream channel will be constructed on the land for the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices; or

Acquisition of coal refuse disposal sites and all coal refuse thereon will serve the purposes of this article or that public ownership is desirable to meet emergency situations and prevent recurrences of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.

Title to all lands acquired pursuant to this section shall be in the name of the state. The price paid for land acquired under this section shall reflect the market value of the land as adversely affected by past coal mining practices.

Where land acquired pursuant to this section is deemed to be suitable for industrial, commercial, residential or recreational development, the director, with the approval of the governor and the secretary of the interior, may sell the land for at least fair market value by public sale under a system of competitive bidding.

The director, when requested after appropriate public notice, shall hold a public hearing, with appropriate notice, in the county or counties in which lands acquired pursuant to this section are located in order to afford all persons an opportunity to participate in the decision concerning the use or disposition of the lands after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 35-11-1206.
Liens for reclamation on private lands.

Within six (6) months after the completion of projects to restore, reclaim, abate, control or prevent adverse effects of past coal or mineral mining practices on privately owned land, the director shall itemize the monies expended and may file a lien against the property with the appropriate county clerk. If the monies expended result in a significant increase in property value, a notarized appraisal by an independent appraiser shall be filed with the lien. The lien shall be the amount determined by the appraisal to be the increase in the fair market value of the land as a result of the restoration, reclamation, abatement, control or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal or mineral mining practices. No lien shall be filed under this section against the property of any person who neither consented to, participated in, nor exercised control over the mining operation which necessitated the reclamation project.

The landowner may petition the district court for the district in which the majority of the land is located within sixty (60) days of the filing of the lien to determine the increase in the fair market value of the land. The amount reported to be the increase in value of the premises shall constitute the amount of the lien and shall be recorded with the lien.

The lien provided in this section shall constitute a lien upon the land as of the date of the expenditure of the monies and shall have priority as a lien second only to the lien of real estate taxes imposed upon the land.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 1; 2005, ch. 155, § 1; 2009, ch. 143, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) substituted “be” for “not exceed the cost of reclamation work” after “The lien shall” and deleted “whichever is less” at the end of the third sentence; deleted “but not exceeding the cost of reclamation work” after “premises” in the last sentence in (b); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “who owned the surface prior to May 2, 1977, and” following “the property of any person” in the last sentence of (a).

§ 35-11-1207.
Miscellaneous authority.

The governor may promulgate any rules and regulations which may be necessary or expedient to implement and administer the provisions of this article.

The director may construct and operate any plants, including major interceptors and other facilities appurtenant to the plant for the control and treatment of water pollution resulting from mine drainage.

The governor may transfer funds to other appropriate state or federal agencies in order to carry out the reclamation activities authorized by this article.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 35-11-1208.
Mine subsidence mitigation program.

The governor may establish a coal mine subsidence mitigation program to assist property owners with mine subsidence problems that threaten life and property in this state. The program shall be operated by the director and be coordinated with the mine subsidence loss insurance program of W.S.

35-11-1301

through

35-11-1304

. The program shall provide for backfilling of mine voids and stabilization of the land where evidence supports imminent or continuous threat to structures defined in W.S.

35-11-1301

(a)(iii) if the threat is due to coal mine subsidence as defined in W.S. 35-11-1301(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 72, § 1.

§ 35-11-1209.
Contract eligibility.

The abandoned mine land division shall not issue a contract to any contractor if the United States department of interior, office of surface mining applicant violator system shows the contractor has any one (1) or more of the following:

Delinquent abandoned mine reclamation fee;

Federal or state failure-to-abate cessation order;

Unabated federal or state imminent harm cessation order;

Delinquent civil penalty issued under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, Public Law 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.];

Bond forfeiture if the violation upon which the forfeiture was based has not been corrected;

Unabated violation of federal or state law, rule or regulation pertaining to air or water environmental protection incurred in connection with any surface coal mining operation;

Unresolved notice of violation.

As used in this section “ownership or controlling interest” means as defined in Title 30 of the Code of Federal Regulations part 773.5, as amended.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 25, § 1; 2005, ch. 155, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the introductory language in (a), which formerly read: “The abandoned mine land division shall not issue a contract to any construction contractor or professional services contractor if any surface coal mining and reclamation operation owned or controlled by the contractor, or by any person who owns or controls the contractor has any”; and added (a)(vii).

The 2010 amendment,

inserted “one (1) or more of the following” in the introductory language of (a) and made stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977. —

The Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 is codified as 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

§ 35-11-1210.
Abandoned mine land funds reserve account.

There is created the abandoned mine land funds reserve account.

All funds received from the federal government, from the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act Amendments of 2006, Section 411(h)(1), pursuant to 2007 H.R. 6111, shall be deposited into the abandoned mine land funds reserve account.

All funds and all interest generated on the funds, shall remain in the abandoned mine land funds reserve account until appropriated by the legislature.

The funds under subsection (b) of this section are separate from and in addition to the funds distributed to Wyoming for the abandoned mine land program under W.S.

35-11-1201

through

35-11-1209

.

There is created the abandoned mine land funds balancing account. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the legislature may deposit into the balancing account and appropriate therefrom funds as it determines appropriate to substitute for or supplement abandoned mine land funds received from the federal government, from the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act Amendments of 2006, Section 411(h)(1).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 49, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2012, ch. 27, § 6.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “Section 411(h)(1)” for “Section 411(h)” in (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2012 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2012, ch. 27, § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 49, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2007.